Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.336

Rights-of-way to railroads and streetcar railways—Deed conveys conditional easement.

The conveyance herein provided for shall not be deemed to convey the fee to the land described, but an easement only thereover and for railroad or streetcar purposes only, and when the right-of-way granted as aforesaid shall not be used for the purposes for which it was granted, then and thereupon the easement right shall immediately become void.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.336. Prior: 1909 c 248 s 4; RRS s 8098. Formerly RCW 28.77.270.]